Hawaii statutes.
§183D-42 Inspection of private and
commercial shooting preserve and game farm. Any member of the board or an
authorized representative may enter, at any time, upon any private and
commercial shooting preserve or game farm of a licensee for the purpose of
inspection thereof, or for the purpose of enforcing this chapter or any game
law. [L 1985, c 174, pt of §4]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next